Florida, session 2026, SB968.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 56 57 Section 1.âParagraph (f) is added to subsection (1) of 58 section 553.73, Florida Statutes, to read: 59 553.73âFlorida Building Code.â 60 (1) 61 (f)âA local government may not adopt a technical amendment 62 to the Florida Building Code which requires a permit or any 63 functionally equivalent local review or approval for a backup 64 power system exempt under s. 553.7923. 65 Section 2.âParagraph (g) is added to subsection (1) of 66 section 553.79, Florida Statutes, to read: 67 553.79âPermits; applications; issuance; inspections.â 68 (1) 69 (g)1.âA local government that issues building permits may 70 not require an owner of a single-family dwelling or the ownerâs 71 contractor to obtain a building permit to perform any work 72 valued at less than $7,500 on the single-family dwellingâs lot. 73 However, a local government may require a building permit for 74 any electrical, plumbing, or structural work, not including the 75 repair or replacement of exterior doors or windows, performed on 76 a lot containing a single-family dwelling regardless of the 77 value of the work. 78 2.âA contractor who performs work that does not require a 79 permit under this paragraph must keep a written record of the 80 work performed, the property address where the work was 81 performed, and the value of such work as proof that such work 82 meets the criteria of subparagraph 1. 83 Section 3.âSection 553.7923, Florida Statutes, is created 84 to read: 85 553.7923âPermit exemption for backup power systems.â 86 (1)(a)âA local enforcement agency may not require a permit 87 or any functionally equivalent local review or approval for the 88 design, installation, relocation, replacement, or repair of a 89 backup power system installed by a contractor properly licensed 90 under chapter 489 to perform such work or by a public utility 91 exempt from licensure under s. 489.503(4). 92 (b)âAs used in this section, the term âbackup power systemâ 93 means equipment and associated components that are installed at 94 or serving a one-family dwelling, two-family dwelling, or 95 townhouse for the purpose of providing onsite electric power 96 during utility outages, load management, resiliency, or similar 97 purposes and that are capable of providing no more than 50 98 kilowatts of output to the residence or have an aggregate 99 storage capacity of no more than 100 kilowatt-hours if such 100 systems include energy storage. 101 (2)âSubsection (1) does not apply to an eligible backup 102 power system that is designed, installed, relocated, replaced, 103 or repaired by an owner-builder without a licensed electrical 104 contractor. This subsection does not authorize unlicensed 105 contracting. 106 (3)âNotwithstanding chapter 125, chapter 166, or any other 107 law, a county, municipality, or special district may not adopt 108 or enforce any ordinance, rule, or other measure that regulates 109 the installation of backup power systems beyond the standards 110 contained in the Florida Building Code or the Florida Fire 111 Prevention Code. 112 (4)(a)âA local enforcement agency may conduct inspections 113 of a backup power system to verify compliance with the Florida 114 Building Code or the Florida Fire Prevention Code. An inspection 115 under this subsection may not be conditioned on obtaining a 116 permit or any functionally equivalent local review or approval 117 and may not include plan review. 118 (b)âThe owner or the installing contractor may hire a 119 private provider to perform the inspections authorized in 120 paragraph (a) in accordance with s. 553.791, including timelines 121 for emergency inspections and submittal of inspection reports. 122 (c)âInspections under this section may be conducted either 123 in person or virtually in accordance with s. 553.791. 124 (d)1.âUpon a finding of noncompliance, the local 125 enforcement agency must issue a written correction notice citing 126 the specific code sections and required cure. The local 127 enforcement agency may issue a stop-work order only to address 128 an immediate life-safety hazard and only for the affected 129 portion of the work. 130 2.âAfter the issues addressed in the stop-work order are 131 corrected, the local enforcement agency must offer a 132 reinspection date within 2 business days or the next day 133 inspections are conducted, whichever is earlier. 134 3.âIf the local enforcement agency fails to inspect the 135 work performed regarding the issues in the stop-work order 136 within 2 business days, the owner or installing contractor may 137 submit a completed private provider inspection report under s. 138 553.791. Submission of a private provider inspection report 139 after the local enforcement agency fails to comply with 140 subparagraph 2. constitutes acceptance of the inspection report 141 by the local enforcement agency. 142 4.âFor existing occupied dwellings, a failed inspection of 143 a backup power system may not be the sole basis for withholding 144 or revoking a certificate of occupancy for the dwelling. The 145 remedy for such failed inspections is to withhold authorization 146 to energize the backup power system until corrections are 147 verified. A private provider may inspect and complete the 148 certificate of compliance pursuant to s. 553.791(13). 149 Section 4.âThis act does not alter or abridge the 150 jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission under chapter 366, 151 Florida Statutes, the exemptions for utilities and cooperatives 152 under s. 366.11, Florida Statutes, or the requirements of rule 153 25-6.065, Florida Administrative Code, relating to 154 interconnection and net metering. This act does not affect any 155 tariff, service policy, or interconnection requirement of any 156 utility or cooperative. 157 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.